Hawaii statutes.
§431:10C-403 Bureau's duties. The
bureau shall promptly assign each claim and application, and notify the
claimant or applicant of the identity and address of the assignee of the claim
or application. Claims and applications shall be assigned so as to minimize
inconvenience to claimants and applicants. The assignee, thereafter, has
rights and obligations as if it had issued motor vehicle mandatory public
liability and property damage policies complying with this article applicable
to the accidental harm or other damage, or, in the case of financial inability
of a motor vehicle insurer or self-insurer to perform its obligations, as if
the assignee had written the applicable motor vehicle insurance policy,
undertaken the self-insurance, or lawfully obligated itself to pay motor
vehicle insurance benefits. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1997, c 251, §50; am
L 1998, c 275, §29]

Case Notes

Petitioner, who was assigned by the state insurance joint
underwriting program bureau to respondent under the assigned claim procedure,
was owed a duty of good faith by respondent given that: (1) under the assigned
claims procedure, respondent owed the same rights and obligations to petitioner
as respondent would owe to an insured to whom respondent had issued a motor vehicle
mandatory public liability and property insurance policy; and (2) respondent's
good faith covenant implied in motor vehicle policies applied to claimants
under the assigned claim procedure irrespective of the absence of a written
insurance policy. 129 H. 478, 304 P.3d 619 (2013).

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next